California statutes. Insurance Code
 method at any time during the period specified in the notice. In the case of individual nonvariable life insurance policies and individual nonvariable annuity contracts, including modified guaranteed contracts, by delivering or mailing the policy pursuant to this section during the cancellation period, the owner shall void the policy from the beginning, and the parties shall be in the same position as if no policy had been issued. All premiums paid and any policy fee paid for the policy shall be refunded by the insurer to the owner within 30 days from the date that the insurer is notified that the owner has canceled the policy. In the case of individual variable annuity contracts and individual variable life insurance policies, return of the policy during the cancellation period shall entitle the owner to a refund of the account value and any policy fee paid for the policy. The account value and policy fee shall be refunded by the insurer to the owner within 30 days from the date that the insurer is notified
 that the owner has canceled the policy.

(b) This section applies to all individual policies issued or delivered in this state on or after January 1, 1990, but does not apply to any policy subject to Section 10127.7. All policies subject to this section which are in effect on January 1, 1990, shall be construed to be in compliance with this section, and any provision in any policy which is in conflict with this section shall be of no force or effect.

(c) This section does not apply to individual life insurance policies issued in connection with a credit transaction or issued under a contractual policy-change or conversion privilege provision contained in a policy.

(d) General references to “policy” or “policies” in this section refer to both life insurance policies and annuity contracts.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3 ) and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 166, Sec. 4.   (AB 2347)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative July 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.10.

(a) Every policy of individual life insurance and every individual annuity contract that is initially delivered or issued for delivery to a senior citizen in this state on and after July 1, 2004, shall have printed on the front of the policy jacket or on the cover page a notice stating that, after receipt of the policy by the owner, the policy may be returned by the owner for cancellation by mail or other delivery method to the insurer or agent from whom it was purchased. The period of time set forth by the insurer for return of the policy by the owner shall be clearly stated in the notice and this period shall be not less than 30 days. The owner may return the policy to the insurer by mail or other delivery method at any time during the period specified in the notice. During the 30-day cancellation
 period, the premium for an individual variable life insurance policy or an individual variable annuity contract may be invested only in fixed-income investments and money-market funds, unless the owner specifically directs that the premium be invested in the mutual funds underlying the variable life insurance policy or variable annuity contract. Return of the policy within the 30-day cancellation period shall have one of the following effects:

(1) In the case of individual variable life insurance policies and individual variable annuity contracts for which the owner has not directed that the premium be invested in the mutual funds underlying the policy during the cancellation period, return of the policy during the cancellation period shall have the effect of voiding the policy from the beginning, and the parties shall be in the same position as if no policy had been issued. All premiums paid and any policy fee paid for the policy shall be
 refunded by the insurer to the owner within 30 days from the date that the insurer is notified that the owner has canceled the policy.

(2) In the case of individual variable life insurance policies and individual variable annuity contracts for which the owner has directed that the premium be invested in the mutual funds underlying the policy during the 30-day cancellation period, cancellation shall entitle the owner to a refund of the account value and any policy fee paid for the policy. The account value shall be refunded by the insurer to the owner within 30 days from the date that the insurer is notified that the owner has canceled the policy.

(b) This section applies to all individual life insurance policies and all individual annuity contracts issued or delivered to senior citizens in this state on or after January 1, 2004. All policies subject to this section which are in
 effect on January 1, 2003, shall be construed to be in compliance with this section, and any provision in any policy which is in conflict with this section shall be of no force or effect.

(c) Every individual nonvariable life insurance policy and every individual nonvariable annuity contract, including modified guaranteed annuity contracts, subject to this section, that is delivered or issued for delivery in this state shall have the following notice printed on the front of the policy jacket or on the cover page in 12-point bold print with one inch of space on all sides, using the exact language in quotation marks below, with whichever one of the three bracketed product descriptions that applies to the product on which the notice appears:

“IMPORTANT!

You have purchased a [life insurance policy], [annuity contract], [modified guaranteed annuity
 contract], referred to below as a “policy.” Carefully review it for limitations.

This policy may be returned within 30 days from the date you received it for a full refund by returning it to the insurance company or agent who sold you this policy. After 30 days, cancellation may result in a substantial penalty, known as a surrender charge.”
The sentence “After 30 days, cancellation may result in a substantial penalty, known as a surrender charge” may be deleted if the policy does not contain a surrender charge. The phrase “known as a surrender charge” may be deleted if the policy contains a penalty but no surrender charge. If the policy contains both a penalty, or penalties, and a surrender charge, the sentence shall state that cancellation may result in “substantial penalties, including a surrender charge.” Whether a charge constitutes a surrender charge or a penalty shall be
 determined by the nature of the charge and not the name given to the charge by the insurer. If the surrender charge is called a “withdrawal charge” in the policy, the insurer shall add the following sentence at the end of the notice:

“In this policy the surrender charge is called a ‘withdrawal charge.’”

(d) Every individual variable life insurance policy and every individual variable annuity contract subject to this section, that is delivered or issued for delivery in this state, shall have the following notice printed on the front of the policy jacket or on the cover page in 12-point bold print with one inch of space on all sides, using the exact language in quotation marks below, with whichever one of the two bracketed product descriptions that applies to the product on which the notice appears:

“IMPORTANT!

You have purchased a [variable life insurance policy], [variable annuity contract], referred to below as a “policy.” Carefully review it for limitations.

This policy may be returned within 30 days from the date you received it. During that 30-day period, your money will be placed in a fixed account or money-market fund, unless you direct that the premium be invested in a stock or bond portfolio underlying the policy during the 30-day period. If you do not direct that the premium be invested in a stock or bond portfolio, and if you return the policy within the 30-day period, you will be entitled to a refund of the premium and any policy fee paid. If you direct that the premium be invested in a stock or bond portfolio during the 30-day period, and if you return the policy during that period, you will be entitled to a refund of the policy’s account value on the day the policy is received by the insurance company or agent who sold
 you this policy, which could be less than the premium you paid for the policy, plus any policy fee paid. A return of the policy after 30 days may result in a substantial penalty, known as a surrender charge.”
The sentence “A return of the policy after 30 days may result in a substantial penalty, known as a surrender charge” may be deleted if the policy does not contain a surrender charge. If the policy contains both a penalty, or penalties, and a surrender charge, the sentence shall state that cancellation may result in “substantial penalties, including a surrender charge.” The phrase “known as a surrender charge” may be deleted if the policy contains a penalty but no surrender charge. Whether or not a charge constitutes a surrender charge or a penalty will be determined by the nature of the charge and not the name given to the charge by the insurer. If the surrender charge is called a “withdrawal charge” in the policy, the
 insurer shall add the following sentence at the end of the notice:

“In this policy the surrender charge is called a ‘withdrawal charge.’”

(e) If the individual annuity contract is an immediate annuity contract, the following sentence, using the exact language in quotation marks below, in 12-point bold print, shall be added at the end of the right to examine language required by this section and before the one inch of space:
“After the 30-day period has expired, you may not be able to get your purchase payment money back in any manner, or in any manner other than in annuity payments made according to the terms of your contract. The insurance company or agent who sold you this contract can explain if your contract has these restrictions.”
(f) This section does not apply to life insurance policies issued in connection with a credit transaction or issued under a contractual policy-change or conversion privilege provision contained in a policy.

(g) For purposes of this chapter, a senior citizen means an individual who is 60 years of age or older on the date of purchase of the policy.

(h) General references to “policy” or “policies” in this section refer to both life insurance policies and annuity contracts.

(i) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5 ) and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 166, Sec. 6.   (AB 2347)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative July 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.11.

Every insurer and life agent offering for sale individual life insurance policies or individual annuity contracts that are initially delivered or issued for delivery to senior citizens in this state on and after January 1, 1995, with the use of nonpreprinted illustrations of nonguaranteed values shall disclose on those illustrations or on an attached cover sheet, in bold or underlined capitalized print, or in the form of a contrasting color sticker, bright highlighter pen, or in any manner that makes it more prominent than the surrounding material, with at least one-half inch space on all four sides, the following statement: 

“THIS IS AN ILLUSTRATION ONLY. AN ILLUSTRATION IS NOT INTENDED TO PREDICT ACTUAL PERFORMANCE. INTEREST RATES, DIVIDENDS, OR VALUES THAT ARE SET FORTH IN THE ILLUSTRATION ARE NOT GUARANTEED, EXCEPT FOR THOSE ITEMS CLEARLY LABELED AS GUARANTEED.” 

All preprinted policy illustrations shall contain this notice in 12-point bold print with at least one-half inch space on all four sides and shall be printed on the illustration form itself or on an attached cover sheet, or in the form of a contrasting color sticker placed on the front of the illustration. All preprinted illustrations containing nonguaranteed values shall show the columns of guaranteed values in bold print. All other columns used in the illustration shall be in standard print. “Values” as used here includes cash value, surrender value, and death benefit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 379, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.12.

Whenever an insurer provides an annual statement to a senior citizen policyowner of an individual life insurance policy or an individual annuity contract issued after January 1, 1995, the insurer shall also provide the current accumulation value and the current cash surrender value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 984, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.13.

(a) All individual life insurance policies and individual annuity contracts for senior citizens that contain a charge upon surrender, partial surrender, excess withdrawal, or penalties upon surrender shall contain a notice disclosing the location of all of the following: the charge, the charge time period, the charge information, and any associated penalty information. The notice shall be in bold 12-point type on the front of the policy jacket or on the cover page of the policy.

(b) A policy shall have just one cover page. If the notice required by this section and the statutorily required right to examine notice are both on the cover page, as opposed to the front cover of the policy jacket, they shall appear on the same
 page.

(c) General references to “policy” in this section refer to both life insurance policies and annuity contracts.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 166, Sec. 8) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 348, Sec. 17.   (AB 1515)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.14.

(a) The department and the Department of Managed Health Care shall compile information required by this section and Section 1363.06 of the Health and Safety Code into two comparative benefit matrices. The first matrix shall compare benefit packages offered pursuant to Section 1373.62 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 10127.15. The second matrix shall compare benefit packages offered pursuant to Sections 1366.35, 1373.6, and 1399.804 of the Health and Safety Code and Sections 10785, 10901.2, and 12682.1.

(b) The comparative benefit matrix shall include:

(1) Benefit information submitted by health care service
 plans pursuant to Section 1363.06 of the Health and Safety Code and by health insurers pursuant to subdivision (d).

(2) The following statements in at least 12-point type at the top of the matrix:

(A) “This benefit summary is intended to help you compare coverage and benefits and is a summary only. For a more detailed description of coverage, benefits, and limitations, please contact the health care service plan or health insurer.”

(B) “The comparative benefit summary is updated annually, or more often if necessary to be accurate.”

(C) “The most current version of this comparative benefit summary is available on (address of the plan’s or insurer’s site).”

This subparagraph applies only to those health insurers
 that maintain an Internet Web site.

(3) The telephone number or numbers that may be used by an applicant to contact either the department or the Department of Managed Health Care, as appropriate, for further assistance.

(c) The department and the Department of Managed Health Care shall jointly prepare two standardized templates for use by health care service plans and health insurers in submitting the information required pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1363.06 and subdivision (d). The templates shall be exempt from the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) Health insurers shall submit the following to the department by January 31, 2003, and annually thereafter:

(1) A summary explanation of the following for each product described in subdivision (a):

(A) Eligibility requirements.

(B) The full premium cost of each benefit package in the service area in which the individual and eligible dependents work or reside.

(C) When and under what circumstances benefits cease.

(D) The terms under which coverage may be renewed.

(E) Other coverage that may be available if benefits under the described benefit package cease.

(F) The circumstances under which choice in the selection of physicians and providers is permitted.

(G) Lifetime and annual maximums.

(H) Deductibles.

(2) A summary explanation of the following coverages, together with the corresponding copayments and limitations, for each product described in subdivision (a):

(A) Professional services.

(B) Outpatient services.

(C) Hospitalization services.

(D) Emergency health coverage.

(E) Ambulance services.

(F) Prescription drug coverage.

(G) Durable medical equipment.

(H) Mental health services.

(I) Residential treatment.

(J) Chemical dependency services.

(K) Home health services.

(L) Custodial care and skilled nursing facilities.

(3) The telephone number or numbers that may be used by an applicant to access a health insurer customer service representative and to request additional information about the insurance policy.

(4) Any other information specified by the department in the template.

(e) Each health insurer shall provide the department with updates to the
 information required by subdivision (d) at least annually, or more often if necessary to maintain the accuracy of the information.

(f) The department and the Department of Managed Health Care shall make the comparative benefit matrices available on their respective Internet Web sites and to the health care service plans and health insurers for dissemination as required by Section 1373.6 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 12682.1, after confirming the accuracy of the description of the matrices with the health insurers and health care service plans.

(g) As used in this section, “benefit matrix” shall have the same meaning as benefit summary.

(h) This section shall not apply to accident-only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, CHAMPUS supplement, long-term care, Medicare supplement, dental-only, or
 vision-only insurance policies.

(i) (1) This section shall be inoperative on January 1, 2014.

(2) If Section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Section 1501 of PPACA, is repealed or amended to no longer apply to the individual market, as defined in Section 2791 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300g-91), this section shall become operative on the date of that repeal or amendment.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued pursuant to that law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 441, Sec. 14.   (AB 1180)   Effective October 1, 2013.   Inoperative, by its own provisions, on January 1, 2014, subject to condition for resuming operation.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.16.

(a) (1) After the termination of the pilot program under Section 10127.15, a health insurer shall continue to provide coverage under the same terms and conditions specified in Section 10127.15 as it existed on January 1, 2007, including the terms of the standard benefit plan and the subscriber payment amount, to each individual who was terminated from the program, pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 12725 of the Insurance Code during the term of the pilot program and who enrolled or applied to enroll in a standard benefit plan within 63 days of termination. The State Department of Health Care Services shall continue to pay the amount described in Section 10127.15 for each of those individuals. A health insurer shall not be required to offer the coverage
 described in Section 10127.15 after the termination of the pilot program to individuals not already enrolled in the program.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subdivision or Section 10127.15 as it existed on January 1, 2007, the following rules shall apply:

(A) (i) A health insurer shall not be obligated to provide coverage to any individual pursuant to this section on or after January 1, 2014.

(ii) The State Department of Health Care Services shall not be obligated to provide any payment to any health insurer under this section for (I) health care expenses incurred on or after January 1, 2014, or (II) the standard monthly administrative fee, as defined in Section 10127.15 as it existed on January 1, 2007, for any month after December 2013.

(B) Each health insurer providing coverage pursuant to this section shall, on or before October 1, 2013, send a notice to each individual enrolled in a standard benefit plan that is in at least 12-point type and with, at minimum, the following information:

(i) Notice as to whether or not the plan will terminate as of January 1, 2014.

(ii) The availability of individual health coverage, including through Covered California, including at least all of the following:

(I) That, beginning on January 1, 2014, individuals seeking coverage may not be denied coverage based on health status.

(II) That the premium rates for coverage offered by a health care service plan or a health insurer cannot be based
 on an individual’s health status.

(III) That individuals obtaining coverage through Covered California may, depending upon income, be eligible for premium subsidies and cost-sharing subsidies.

(IV) That individuals seeking coverage must obtain this coverage during an open or special enrollment period, and a description of the open and special enrollment periods that may apply.

(C) As a condition of receiving payment for a reporting period pursuant to this section, a health insurer shall provide the State Department of Health Care Services with a complete, final annual reconciliation report by the earlier of December 31, 2014, or an earlier date as prescribed by Section 10127.15, as it existed on January 1, 2007, for that reporting period. To the extent that it receives a complete, final reconciliation report for a
 reporting period by the date required pursuant to this subparagraph, the State Department of Health Care Services shall complete reconciliation with the health insurer for that reporting period within 18 months after receiving the report.

(b) If the state fails to expend, pursuant to this section, sufficient funds for the state’s contribution amount to any health insurer, the health insurer may increase the monthly payments that its subscribers are required to pay for any standard benefit plan to the amount that the State Department of Health Care Services would charge without a state subsidy for the same insurance product issued to the same individual within the program.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific
 this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 18, Sec. 25.   (SB 75)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.17.

(a) The Life and Annuity Consumer Protection Fund is hereby created as a special account within the Insurance Fund. Each insurer admitted to transact insurance in this state shall pay a fee to be determined by the commissioner, not to exceed one dollar ($1), for each individual life insurance policy and each individual annuity product that it issues to a resident of this state. If an insurer elects to charge the purchaser of a life insurance policy or annuity product this fee, the fee shall be set forth as a separate charge in the contract schedule or premium notice. Life insurance or annuity forms are not required to be filed again for review as a consequence of this provision. The revenue from this fee shall be deposited
 into the Life and Annuity Consumer Protection Fund.

(b) Moneys in the Life and Annuity Consumer Protection Fund shall be distributed by the commissioner, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to fund the reasonable costs incurred in regulating entities transacting life insurance and annuity products in this state. Moneys in the fund shall not be used for any other purpose.

(c) Fifty percent of these funds shall be distributed within the department for functions related to individual life insurance and annuity products, including, but not limited to:

(1) Investigating and prosecuting financial abuse by insurance licensees, or persons holding themselves out to be insurance licensees, or any person purporting to be engaged
 in the business of insurance.

(2) Responding to consumer inquiries and complaints related to life insurance or annuity products.

(3) Disseminating information to insurers, insureds, and others regarding the applicable regulation of life insurance and annuity products, including consumer protection, purchasing and using insurance and annuity products, claim filing, benefit delivery, and dispute resolution.

(4) Regulating and overseeing life insurance and annuity products and advertising for these products directed toward consumers.

(d) Fifty percent of the funds shall be distributed to district attorneys for investigating and prosecuting individual
 life insurance and annuity product financial abuse cases involving insurance
 licensees, or persons holding themselves out to be insurance licensees, or any person purporting to be engaged in the business of insurance, and for other projects beneficial to insurance consumers.

(1) The commissioner shall distribute funds to district attorneys who are able to show a likely positive outcome that will benefit consumers in the local jurisdiction based on specific criteria promulgated by the commissioner. Each local district attorney desiring a portion of those funds shall submit to the commissioner an application, including, at a minimum all of the following:

(A) The proposed use of the moneys and the anticipated outcome.

(B) A list of all prior relevant cases or projects and a copy of the
 final accounting for each. If cases or projects are ongoing, the most recent accounting shall be provided.

(C) A detailed budget, including salaries and general expenses, and specifically identifying the cost of purchase or rental of equipment or supplies.

(2) Each district attorney that receives funds pursuant to this section shall submit a final detailed accounting at the conclusion or closure of each case or project. For cases or projects that continue longer than six months, interim accountings shall be submitted every six months, or as otherwise directed by the commissioner.

(3) Each district attorney that receives funds pursuant to this section shall submit a final report to the commissioner, which may be
 made public, as to the success of the case or project conducted. The report shall provide information and statistics on the number of active investigations, arrests, indictments, and convictions. The applications for moneys, the distribution of moneys, and the annual reports shall be public documents.

(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, information submitted to the commissioner pursuant to this section concerning criminal investigations, whether active or inactive, shall be confidential.

(5) The commissioner may conduct a fiscal audit of the programs administered under this subdivision. This fiscal audit shall be conducted by an internal audit unit of the department. The cost of any fiscal audits shall be paid for from the Life and Annuity Consumer
 Protection Fund established by this section.

(6) If the commissioner determines that a district attorney is unable or unwilling to investigate or prosecute a relevant financial abuse case, the commissioner may discontinue distribution of funds allocated for that matter and may redistribute those funds to other eligible district attorneys.

(e) If, as of June 30 of any calendar year, the total amount in the Life and Annuity Consumer Protection Fund exceeds five million dollars ($5,000,000), the commissioner shall reduce the amount of the assessment accordingly for the following year to eliminate that excess. An insurer, upon receipt of an invoice, shall transmit payment to the department for deposit in the Life and Annuity Consumer Protection Fund. Any balance remaining in the Life
 and Annuity Consumer Protection Fund at the end of the fiscal year shall be retained in the account, to be available in the next fiscal year.

(f) The commissioner may develop guidelines for implementing or clarifying these provisions, including guidelines for the allocation, distribution, and potential return of unused funds. The commissioner may, from time to time, issue regulations for implementing or clarifying these provisions.

(g) The commissioner shall provide a consolidated report annually on the department’s Internet Web site, which shall include, but is not limited to, the following information:

(1) The number of opened consumer complaints related to life insurance or annuity products.

(2) The number of opened investigations related to life insurance or annuity products.

(3) The number of investigations related to life insurance or annuity products referred to and reported by prosecuting agencies.

(4) The number of administrative or regulatory cases related to life insurance or annuity products referred to the department’s legal division.

(5) The number of administrative or regulatory enforcement actions taken in cases related to life insurance or annuity products.

(6) Descriptions of efforts by the department to disseminate information to insurers and others regarding the applicable regulation
 of life insurance and annuity products, including consumer protection, purchasing and using insurance and annuity products, claim filing, benefit delivery, and dispute resolution.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 347, Sec. 7.   (SB 476)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.18.

(a) On and after January 1, 2005, a health insurer issuing individual policies of health insurance that ceases to offer individual coverage in this state shall offer coverage to the policyholders who had been covered by those policies at the time of withdrawal under the same terms and conditions as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b), subdivisions (c) to (e), inclusive, and subdivision (h) of Section 12682.1.

(b) The department may adopt regulations to implement this section.

(c) This section shall not apply when a plan participating in Medi-Cal, Healthy
 Families, Access for Infants and Mothers, or any other contract between the plan and a government entity no longer contracts with the government entity to provide health coverage in the state, or a specified area of the state, nor shall this section apply when a plan ceases entirely to market, offer, and issue any and all forms of coverage in any part of this state after the effective date of this section.

(d) (1) This section shall be inoperative on January 1, 2014.

(2) If Section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Section 1501 of PPACA, is repealed or amended to no longer apply to the individual market, as defined in Section 2791 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-91), this section shall become operative on the date of that repeal or amendment.

(3) For
 purposes of this subdivision, “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued pursuant to that law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 441, Sec. 16.   (AB 1180)   Effective October 1, 2013.   Inoperative, by its own provisions, on January 1, 2014, subject to condition for resuming operation.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.19.

(a) Commencing March 1, 2013, and at least annually thereafter, a health insurer, not including a health insurer offering specialized health insurance policies, shall provide to the department, in a form and manner determined by the department in consultation with the Department of Managed Health Care, the number of covered lives, by product type, as of December 31 of the prior year, that receive health care coverage under a health insurance policy that covers individuals and small groups inside and outside of the California Health Benefit Exchange, large groups, administrative services only business lines, and any other business lines. Health insurers shall include the unduplicated enrollment data in specific product types as determined by the department, including, but not limited to, HMO, point-of-service, PPO,
 grandfathered, and Medi-Cal managed care. Data reported pursuant to this subdivision shall specify the covered persons that are being reported pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) Commencing March 1, 2020, and at least annually thereafter, information specific to a multiple employer welfare arrangement (MEWA) shall be provided to the department, in a form and manner determined by the department in consultation with the Department of Managed Health Care, as follows:

(1) A health insurer that provides coverage through a MEWA that is not subject to Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 742.20) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 shall provide the name of each MEWA and the number of covered persons in each MEWA as of December 31 of the prior year, divided by market segment and product type. Data reported pursuant to this subdivision shall be identified and separately reported under
 subdivision (a).

(2) A MEWA that is subject to Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 742.20) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 shall provide the number of covered persons in the MEWA as of December 31 of the prior year, divided by product type. Compliance with a data call issued pursuant to this section satisfies the requirements of this subdivision.

(c) The department shall publicly report the data provided by each health insurer and MEWA pursuant to this section, including, but not limited to, posting the data on the department’s internet website. The department shall consult with the Department of Managed Health Care to ensure that the data reported is comparable and consistent, does not duplicate existing reporting requirements, and utilizes existing reporting formats. The data for the previous calendar year shall be made available no later than April 15 of each calendar
 year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 217.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.20.

(a) Beginning on July 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, a health insurer offering a qualified health plan through the Exchange shall report to the commissioner the total amount of funds maintained in a segregated account pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1303 of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148). This annual report shall contain the ending balance of the account and the total dollar amount of claims paid during the reporting year.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Exchange” means the California Health Benefit Exchange established pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code.

(2) “Qualified health plan” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1301 of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 563, Sec. 2.   (AB 2205)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Discontinuance of Group Life Insurance and Discontinuance and Replacement of Group Disability Insurance [10128. - 10128.4.]

10128.

The provisions of this article shall apply to all policies of group life insurance issued in this state pursuant to the provisions of Sections 10202, 10202.7, 10202.8, 10203 and 10203.7, to all group disability policies issued in this state pursuant to the provisions of Section 10270.5, to any group nonprofit hospital service contract issued in this state pursuant to the provisions of Section 11512.2, and to any self-insured welfare benefit plan issued in this state as defined in Section 10121.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

10128.1.

In this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) “Carrier” means the insurance company, nonprofit hospital service corporation, or other entity responsible for the payment of benefits or provision of services under a policy.

(b) “Dependent” shall have the meaning set forth in a policy.

(c) “Discontinuance” shall mean the termination of a policy or the termination of coverage between an entire employer unit under a group disability policy, group nonprofit hospital service contract or self-insured welfare benefit plan, and does not refer to the termination of any agreement between any individual member under a contract and the disability insurer, nonprofit hospital service contract or self-insured welfare benefit plan.

(d) “Employee” means all agents, employees, and members of unions or associations to whom benefits are provided under a policy.

(e) “Extension of benefits” means the continuation of coverage under a particular benefit provided under a policy following discontinuance with respect to an employee or dependent who is totally disabled on the date of discontinuance. 

(f) “Policy” means any group insurance policy, group hospital service contract or other plan, contract or policy subject to the provisions of this article. 

(g) “Policyholder” means the entity to which a policy or contract specified in Section 10128 is issued.

(h) “Premium” means the consideration payable to the carrier.

(i) “Replacement coverage” means the benefits provided by a succeeding carrier.

(j) “Totally disabled” shall have the meaning set forth in a policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 126, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10128.2.

Every policy containing a life insurance benefit shall contain a reasonable extension of such benefit upon discontinuance of the policy with respect to employees who become totally disabled while insured under the policy on or after the date this article becomes applicable to such policy and who continue to be totally disabled at the date of discontinuance of the policy. Every policy containing a loss of time benefit, a specific indemnity during hospital confinement, or a hospital, medical, or surgical expense benefit shall contain a reasonable extension of such benefits upon discontinuance of the policy with respect to employees or dependents who become totally disabled while insured under the policy on or after the date this article becomes applicable to such policy and who continue to be totally disabled at the date of discontinuance of the policy.
